Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 6 Construction Activity Prohibition on Abandoned Landfills

8-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Construction Activity Prohibition on Abandoned Landfills Act of 1988.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-6-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 821, § 1.

Cross references.

Requirements for deeds conveying interest in real property used as commercial landfill, §

44-5-48

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “This chapter” was substituted for “This Act” at the beginning of the Code section.

8-6-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Construction activity” means to erect or build an enclosed building or structure of any type, kind, or design.

“Division” means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

“Landfill” means any location operated as a commercial venture for profit or operated by a county or municipality for the disposal of solid wastes or any location where a private owner accepts solid wastes for compensation from sources other than his own property for disposal.

“Solid waste” means putrescible and nonputrescible wastes, except water carried body waste, and shall include garbage, rubbish (paper, cartons, boxes, wood, tree branches, yard trimmings, furniture and appliances, metal, tin cans, glass, crockery, or dunnage), ashes, street refuse, dead animals, sewage sludges, animal manures, industrial wastes (waste materials generated in industrial operations), residue from incineration, food processing wastes, demolition wastes, abandoned automobiles, dredging wastes, construction wastes, and any other waste material in a solid or semisolid state not otherwise defined in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-6-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 821, § 1.

8-6-3.
Division landfill records; filing notice of existence of landfill.

The division shall maintain records on each landfill operated now or in the future in this state, which records shall include an accurate legal description of the boundaries of the landfill and the dates of its operation.

The division shall file notice of the existence of the landfill with the clerk of the superior court of the county or counties within which the landfill is located.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-6-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 821, § 1.

8-6-4.
Permit required for construction of building or enclosed structure; exception.

No person shall construct any building or enclosed structure of any type, kind, or design on any real property on which a landfill on the public records has been located without first obtaining a permit for such construction from the local governing authority.

This Code section shall not apply to construction activity by public service corporations or to the construction of roads, highways, or bridges.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 821, § 1.